Tennessee, session 114, HB2486.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 64-1-606, is amended by adding the
following sentence to the end of the section:
The annual report submitted pursuant to this section may be transmitted electronically.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2486
011854
- 1 -